Hawaii statutes.
§367-3 Powers and duties of commission.
The commission shall:

(1) Act as a central clearinghouse and coordinating
body for governmental and nongovernmental activities and information relating
to the status of women;

(2) Create public awareness and understanding of the
responsibilities, needs, potentials, and contributions of women and their roles
in the changing society;

(3) Recommend legislative and administrative action
on equal treatment and opportunities for women;

(4) Encourage a long-range program of education of
women in their political rights and responsibilities, particularly with respect
to their voting duties;

(5) Maintain contacts with appropriate federal,
state, local, and international agencies concerned with the status of women;

(6) Cooperate and collaborate with national groups on
the status of women and arrange for participation by representatives of the
State in White House conferences and other national conferences from time to
time;

(7) Administer funds allocated for its work; be
authorized to accept, disburse, and allocate funds that may become available
from other governmental and private sources; provided that all such funds shall
be disbursed or allocated in compliance with any specific designation stated by
the donor and in the absence of such specific designation, such funds shall be
disbursed or allocated on projects related to any of the purposes of this
chapter; and

(8) Submit an annual report with recommendations to
the governor and the legislature. [L 1970, c 190, pt of §1; am L 1972, c 81,
§1; am L 2000, c 270, §3]

Cross References

Reports to governor, see §93-12.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next